Tennessee statutes. Title 24 Evidence and Witnesses
Part 1

General Provisions

24-6-101. Copy of judgment without entire record.

In any litigation, certified copies of final judgments or decrees of any court of record may be used as evidence in such litigation, without the final judgment or decree being supported by the entire record upon which it is based. Such certified judgment or decree shall have the same force and effect as evidence as it would have if the entire record upon which it is based were filed with the judgment or decree, it being the intention to expedite the preparation of cases and save costs.

This section shall not apply to litigation in which a direct attack is made on the judgment or decree and the proceedings upon which it is based, nor to litigation involving the validity of the judgment or decree.

This section shall not prevent any of the parties to the litigation from using as evidence in such litigation the entire record upon which the final judgment or decree is based.

Acts 1919, ch. 130, §§ 1, 2; Shan. Supp., §§ 5580a1, 5580a2; mod. Code 1932, §§ 9755, 9756; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 24-604; modified.

Cross-References. Authentication of copy, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 44.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 193.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 4 Tenn. Juris., Bankruptcy, § 39.

24-6-102 — 24-6-104. [Reserved.]

Every officer having the custody of a public record or writing, is bound to give any person, on demand, a certified copy thereof, on payment of the legal fees; and, if no fee has been fixed by law, on payment of reasonable compensation.

Code 1858, § 3792; Shan., § 5577; Code 1932, § 9751; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 24-622.

Rule Reference. Sections 24-6-105 — 24-6-107 are referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Rule 803 of the Tennessee Rules of Evidence.

24-6-106. Extract copies from records.

When any deed, mortgage, deed of trust, decree, or other instrument appears of record in the register's office of any county, containing the description of more than one (1) tract, lot, or parcel of land, any person desiring a copy of any such deed, etc., may direct that only the description of such lots, tracts, or parcels be included in the copy as such person may desire; and the register in making the copy shall insert not less than one-half (½) line of x marks before and after, or before or after, as the case may be, indicating that descriptions have been omitted from the copy.

Such copies so made shall have full force and effect as evidence.

Acts 1897, ch. 59, §§ 1, 2; Shan., §§ 5576a1, 5576a2; Code 1932,§§ 9749, 9750; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 24-623.

Cross-References. Authentication of copy, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 44.

Rule Reference. Sections 24-6-105 — 24-6-107 are referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Rule 803 of the Tennessee Rules of Evidence.

24-6-107. Certificate of search.

The certificate of a public officer that such officer has made diligent and ineffectual search for a paper in that officer's office is of the same efficacy in all cases as if such officer had personally appeared and sworn to such facts.

Code 1858, § 3793; Shan., § 5578; Code 1932, § 9752; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 24-624.

Cross-References. Lost records, §24-8-109.

Rule Reference. Sections 24-6-105 — 24-6-107 are referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Rule 803 of the Tennessee Rules of Evidence.